Hawaii statutes.
[§141-38]
Violations. In addition to any other violations of this part, the
following acts and omissions by any licensee or authorized representative
thereof constitute violations for which civil penalties up to $500 and
disciplinary sanctions, including revocation of a license, may be imposed by
the chairperson:

(1) Refusal or failure by a licensee or authorized
representative to fully cooperate and assist the board with the inspection
process;

(2) Failure to provide any information required or
requested by the board for purposes pursuant to this part;

(3) Providing false, misleading, or incorrect
information pertaining to the licensee's cultivation of industrial hemp to the
chairperson by any means, including but not limited to information provided in
any application form, report, record, or inspection required or maintained
pursuant to this part;

(4) Growing industrial hemp that when tested is shown
to have a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration greater than 0.3 per cent
on a dry weight basis or a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration allowed by
federal law, whichever is greater;

(5) Failure to pay fees assessed by the chairperson
for inspection or laboratory analysis costs; or

(6) Possessing, outside of a field of lawful
cultivation, resin, flowering tops, or leaves that have been removed from the
hemp plant; provided that the presence of a de minimis amount, or insignificant
number, of hemp leaves or flowering tops in hemp bales that result from the
normal and appropriate processing of industrial hemp shall not apply to this
paragraph. [L 2016, c 228, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next